Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1725
Alternative payment systems authorized.

The Department of Health and Human Services may either develop an electronic benefit system for purposes of eliminating as much paper and coupon conveyance of public assistance as is practical or provide cash in lieu of coupons.

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 25;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 362.